Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.010

Intent.

The purpose of this chapter is to assist Washington produce farmers in implementation of the produce safety rule adopted by the United States food and drug administration pursuant to the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., as amended by the federal food safety modernization act (P.L. 111-353).

[ 2018 c 106 s 1.]